Maryland, session 2025, SB0265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–601.
(a) Permits issued by the Department under the following sections shall be issued
in accordance with this subtitle:
(1) Air quality control permits to construct subject to § 2–404 of this article;
(2) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend landfill
systems, incinerators for public use, or rubble landfills subject to § 9–209 of this article;
(3) Permits to discharge pollutants to waters of the State issued pursuant
to § 9–323 of this article;
(4) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend a structure
used for storage or distribution of any type of sewage sludge issued, renewed, or amended
pursuant to § 9–234.1 or § 9–238 of this article;
(5) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a controlled hazardous
substance facility issued pursuant to § 7–232 of this article;
(6) Permits to own, operate, or maintain a hazardous material facility
issued pursuant to § 7–103 of this article;
(7) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a low–level nuclear
waste facility issued pursuant to § 7–233 of this article; [and]
(8) Potable reuse permits issued in accordance with § 9–303.2 of this
article; AND
(9) PERMITS FOR RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION ISSUED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–303.4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 442
(b) “Board” means the Water Science Advisory Board.
(c) “CAFO” means a concentrated animal feeding operation, as defined in
Department regulations.
(d) “Discharge permit” means a permit issued by the Department for the
discharge of any pollutant or combination of pollutants into the waters of this State.
(E) “DRINKING WATER TREATMENT FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY THAT IS
USED TO TREAT WATER IN A PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM.
[(e)] (F) “Person” includes the federal government, this State, any county,
municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of this State, or any of their units.
(G) “PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–401 OF THIS
TITLE.
[(f)] (H) “Reclaimed water” means sewage that:
(1) Has been treated to a high quality suitable for various reuses; and
(2) Has a concentration of less than:
(i) 3 fecal coliform colonies per 100 milliliters;
(ii) 10 milligrams per liter of 5–day biological oxygen demand; and
(iii) 10 milligrams per liter of total suspended solids.
(I) “RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION” MEANS THE PLANNED PLACEMENT OF
RECLAIMED WATER INTO A SURFACE WATER RESERVOIR USED AS A SOURCE FOR A
DRINKING WATER TREATMENT FACILITY.
(J) “RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT” MEANS A PERMIT ISSUED BY
THE DEPARTMENT FOR RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION.
[(g)] (K) “Sewage” means any human or animal excretion, domestic waste, or
industrial waste.
[(h)] (L) (1) “Sewerage system” means:
(i) The channels used or intended to be used to collect and dispose
of sewage; and
– 3 –

Ch. 442 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Any structure and appurtenance used or intended to be used to
collect or prepare sewage for discharge into the waters of this State.
(2) “Sewerage system” includes any sewer of any size.
(3) “Sewerage system” does not include the plumbing system inside any
building served by the sewerage system.
9–303.2.
(b) There is an Indirect Potable Reuse Pilot Program in the Department.
(o) (1) On or before December 31, 2024, the Department shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly on:
[(1)] (I) The status of the Pilot Program;
[(2)] (II) Whether the Pilot Program should be extended or made
permanent; and
[(3)] (III) Any statutory or regulatory changes that the Department
recommends to permanently authorize the regulated use of reclaimed water as a source for
drinking water treatment facilities, if appropriate.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE PILOT PROGRAM.
9–303.4.
(A) THERE IS A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY NOT PERFORM
RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
MAY ISSUE, MODIFY, OR RENEW A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT IF THE
DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT:
(1) THE TREATMENT PROCESS WILL MEET OR SURPASS STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE WATER ENTERS THE RESERVOIR;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 442
(2) THE TREATMENT PROCESS WILL MEET OR SURPASS STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE WATER ENTERS THE DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM; AND
(3) THE APPLICANT AGREES TO PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT THE
RIGHT OF ENTRY ON THE PERMIT SITE AT ANY REASONABLE TIME TO INSPECT OR
INVESTIGATE FOR A VIOLATION OR POTENTIAL VIOLATION OF THE RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PERMIT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY INCLUDE IN A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION
PERMIT ANY TERM, CONDITION, OR REQUIREMENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS
APPROPRIATE TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(E) THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL
GOVERN THE ISSUANCE OF POTABLE REUSE RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMITS.
(F) (1) A PERSON SHALL OBTAIN, ON WRITTEN APPLICATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT, A PERMIT FROM THE DEPARTMENT TO PERFORM RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION.
(2) AN APPLICATION FOR A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A FEASIBILITY STUDY SHOWING THE PURPOSE AND THE NEED FOR
THE RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PROJECT, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION AND TECHNICAL ANALYSIS OF THE
RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PROJECT AND ALTERNATIVE OPTIONS; AND
2. THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PROJECT AND ALTERNATIVE OPTIONS; AND
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) A FEASIBILITY STUDY IS NOT REQUIRED FOR A RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PROJECT THAT WAS PREVIOUSLY APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THE INDIRECT POTABLE REUSE PILOT PROGRAM.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REFUSE TO ISSUE A RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PERMIT IF:
– 5 –

Ch. 442 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE APPLICANT FAILS TO PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION
REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) THE APPLICANT FAILS OR REFUSES TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT
TO INSPECT THE PERMIT SITE;
(3) THE SOURCE OF THE RECLAIMED WATER FAILS TO COMPLY WITH
ANY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW, REGULATION, OR PERMIT;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT THE ISSUANCE OF THE
RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT WOULD VIOLATE ANY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW
OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; OR
(5) THE APPLICANT FAILS OR REFUSES TO PAY THE APPLICATION
FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION
PERMIT FOR A TERM LONGER THAN 5 YEARS.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT
IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT:
(1) THE APPLICATION INCLUDED FALSE OR INACCURATE
INFORMATION;
(2) CONDITIONS OR REQUIREMENTS OF THE RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PERMIT HAVE BEEN OR ARE ABOUT TO BE VIOLATED;
(3) SUBSTANTIAL DEVIATION FROM PLANS, SPECIFICATIONS, OR
REQUIREMENTS HAS OCCURRED OR IS ABOUT TO OCCUR;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT IS REFUSED ENTRY TO ANY PREMISES FOR
THE PURPOSE OF EVALUATING COMPLIANCE WITH THE RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION
PERMIT;
(5) A CHANGE IN CONDITIONS EXISTS THAT REQUIRES THE
TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF THE USE OF
RECLAIMED WATER;
(6) THERE IS NONCOMPLIANCE WITH A DISCHARGE PERMIT OR
PRETREATMENT REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT MAY AFFECT
THE RECLAIMED WATER;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 442
(7) ANY REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER THE FEDERAL SAFE
DRINKING WATER ACT, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS TITLE, OR TITLE 12 OF THIS ARTICLE
HAS BEEN OR IS THREATENED TO BE VIOLATED; OR
(8) THE RECLAIMED WATER MAY THREATEN PUBLIC HEALTH,
SAFETY, COMFORT, OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
ESTABLISH:
(I) THE STANDARDS FOR RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION; AND
(II) THE APPLICATION, ISSUANCE, REVOCATION, AND
MODIFICATION OF A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL SET A
REASONABLE APPLICATION FEE IN AN AMOUNT DESIGNATED DESIGNED TO COVER
THE COST OF ISSUING AND ADMINISTERING A RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PERMIT
UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(K) ALL REVENUES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING APPLICATION FEES, PERMIT FEES, RENEWAL FEES, OR ANY
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY, CIVIL PENALTY, OR ANY FINE IMPOSED BY A COURT FOR
VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION, SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL FUND, TO BE
USED ONLY FOR THE OPERATION AND OVERSIGHT OF THE RESERVOIR
AUGMENTATION PROGRAM.
(L) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2035, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE RESERVOIR AUGMENTATION PROGRAM.
9–320.
(a) There is a Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(b) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 9–303.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
following payments shall be made into the Maryland Clean Water Fund:
(1) All application fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and funds collected by
the Department under this subtitle, including any civil or administrative penalty or any
fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this subtitle;
– 7 –

Ch. 442 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Any civil penalty or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of
Title 5, Subtitle 5 of this article relating to water appropriation and use;
(3) Any civil or administrative penalty or any fine imposed by a court under
the provisions of Title 4, Subtitle 1 of this article;
(4) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 2, Part
III of this title and §§ 9–269 and 9–270 of this title and any civil or administrative penalty
or fine imposed by a court under the provisions of Subtitle 2 of this title; and
(5) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 24 of this
title and any civil or administrative penalty or fine imposed by a court under the provisions
of Subtitle 24 of this title.
Chapter 122 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. [Section 1 of this Act] IT shall remain effective through June 30, [2028] 2030,
and, at the end of June 30, [2028] 2030, [Section 1 of] this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 123 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. [Section 1 of this Act] IT shall remain effective through June 30, [2028] 2030,
and, at the end of June 30, [2028] 2030, [Section 1 of] this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 8 –